North Carolina, session 2025, SB356.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 63A-24 reads as rewritten:
"§ 63A-24. General laws apply to Authority; exceptions.
(a) Except as provided in this section, the general laws that apply to State agencies apply
to the Authority. The following general laws, to the extent provided below, do not apply to the
Authority:
…
(c) Notwithstanding G.S. 105-164.14(e), the Secretary of Revenue shall credit the
quarterly refunds of local sales and use taxes paid indirectly by the North Carolina Global
Transpark Authority (Authority) back to the Authority."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to refunds
payable for the first full quarter occurring on or after that date.
*S356-v-1*